Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1232HV (2) 91 ms/md H.F. 2777 Section 1. Section 403.19, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. That portion of the taxes each year in excess of such 3 amount shall be allocated to and when collected be paid into a 4 special fund of the municipality to pay the principal of and 5 interest on loans, moneys advanced to, or indebtedness, whether 6 funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, including bonds 7 issued under the authority of section 403.9, subsection 1 , 8 incurred by the municipality to finance or refinance, in whole 9 or in part, an urban renewal project within the area, and to 10 provide assistance for low and moderate income family housing 11 as provided in section 403.22 . However, except as provided 12 in paragraph âbâ , taxes for the regular and voter-approved 13 physical plant and equipment levy of a school district imposed 14 pursuant to section 298.2 and taxes for the instructional 15 support program of a school district imposed pursuant to 16 section 257.19 , taxes for the payment of bonds and interest 17 of each taxing district, taxes for emergency medical services 18 imposed pursuant to chapter 357F, 357G, or 422D, and taxes 19 imposed under section 346.27, subsection 22 , related to joint 20 county-city buildings shall be collected against all taxable 21 property within the taxing district without limitation by the 22 provisions of this subsection . 23 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to property taxes 24 due and payable in fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 25 2027. 26